District of Columbia statutes.
15-701

Compensation taxed as costs; attorneys’ compensation from clients.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided by law, only the compensation specified in this chapter may be taxed and allowed to attorneys, proctors, United States attorney, marshal, witnesses, and jurors.

(b)

This chapter does not prohibit attorneys and proctors from charging or receiving from their clients other than the government such reasonable compensation for their services, in addition to the taxable costs, as may be in accordance with general usage or may be agreed upon.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 531, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
June 19, 1986, 100 Stat. 633, Pub. L. 99-336, § 4(b)(1)
Notaries public, fees, see §§ 1-1213 and 1-1214.
1981 Ed., § 15-701.
1973 Ed., § 15-701.